Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-5,203
Owner; provide schedule.

The State Fire Marshal may require the owner of an amusement ride to provide the State Fire Marshal with a tentative schedule of events at which the amusement ride will be operated within this state. The State Fire Marshal shall establish timetables and procedures for providing and updating such schedules.

Laws 1987, LB 226, § 14;

R.S.1943, (2010), § 48-1814;

Laws 2019, LB301, § 39.